Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1981.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(10) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(10) Any farm vehicle used exclusively upon a farm or farms owned or operated by the owner of the vehicle, subject to the following:* * *(v) A law enforcement officer may not stop a farm vehicle properly displaying an exemption plate issued under section 1924(c) (relating to farm vehicles) solely 12345678910111213141516171819 for the purpose of requiring the operator to provide proof of a biennial certificate of exemption for the farm vehicle.* * *Section 2. Section 1924 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1924. Farm vehicles.* * *(c) Exemption plate.--The department shall establish an exemption plate for a farm vehicle described under section 1302(10) (relating to vehicles exempt from registration) and shall issue the plate to a person who has been issued the certificate of exemption and paid the fee for the plate. The cost of the plate may not exceed $20. A person who has obtained the plate for a farm vehicle may display the plate on the rear of the farm vehicle.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1981PN2501 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617